Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.180

ESD board—Compliance with rules and regulations—Depository and distribution center—Cooperative service programs, joint purchasing programs, and direct student service programs including pupil transportation.

In addition to other powers and duties as provided by law, every educational service district board shall:

(1) Comply with rules of the state board of education and the superintendent of public instruction.

(2) If the district board deems necessary, establish and operate for the schools within the boundaries of the educational service district a depository and distribution center for films, tapes, charts, maps, and other instructional material as recommended by the school district superintendents within the service area of the educational service district. However, the district may also provide the services of the depository and distribution center to private schools within the district so long as such private schools pay such fees that reflect actual costs for services and the use of instructional materials as may be established by the educational service district board.

(3) Establish cooperative service programs for school districts within the educational service district and joint purchasing programs for schools within the educational service district pursuant to RCW 28A.320.080(3). However, on matters relating to cooperative service programs the board and superintendent of the educational service district shall seek the prior advice of the superintendents of local school districts within the educational service district.

(4) Establish direct student service programs for school districts within the educational service district including pupil transportation. However, for the provision of state-funded pupil transportation for special education cooperatives programs for special education conducted under RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100, the educational service district, with the consent of the participating school districts, shall be entitled to receive directly state apportionment funds for that purpose: PROVIDED, That the board of directors and superintendent of a local school district request the educational service district to perform said service or services: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the educational service district board of directors and superintendents agree to provide the requested services: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the provisions of chapter 39.34 RCW are strictly adhered to: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the educational service district board of directors may contract with the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth and the school for the blind to provide transportation services or other services necessary for the regional delivery of educational services for children who are deaf or hearing impaired.

[ 2019 c 266 s 16; 2009 c 381 s 26; 1990 c 33 s 276; 1988 c 65 s 2; 1987 c 508 s 3; 1982 c 46 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 66 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 16; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 11. Formerly RCW 28A.21.086.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2009 c 381: See note following RCW 72.40.015.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 66: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 ex.s. c 66 s 3.]

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.